California, session 20252026, AB407.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 6588.7 of the Government Code is amended to read:6588.7.(a)An authority whose financing activities are limited to financing utility projects and projects for the use or benefit of public agencies providing water, wastewater, or electrical service may finance utility projects as provided in this section, including the issuance of rate reduction bonds and the imposition and adjustment of utility project charges.(b)A local agency that owns and operates a publicly owned utility may apply to an authority specified in subdivision (a) to finance costs of a utility project for the publicly owned utility with the proceeds of rate reduction bonds if at the time of application, bonds payable from revenues of the publicly owned utility are, or upon issuance would be, rated investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency. In its application to an authority for the financing or refinancing, the local agency shall specify the utility project to be financed by the rate reduction bonds, the maximum principal amount, the maximum interest rate, and the maximum stated terms of the rate reduction bonds.(c)A local agency shall not apply to an authority for financing or refinancing of a utility project pursuant to this section unless the legislative body of the local agency has determined all of the following:(1)The project to be financed or refinanced is a utility project.(2)The local agency is electing to finance or refinance costs of the utility project pursuant to this section and the financing costs associated with the financing or refinancing are to be paid from utility project property, including the utility project charge for the rate reduction bonds issued for the utility project in accordance with this section.(3)Based on information available to, and projections used by, the legislative body, the rates of the publicly owned utility plus the utility project charge resulting from the financing or refinancing of the utility project with rate reduction bonds are expected to be lower than the rates of the publicly owned utility if the utility project was financed or refinanced with bonds payable from revenues of the publicly owned utility.(4)A local agency with a publicly owned utility having 500,000 or more retail customers may, in lieu of making the determination in paragraph (3), determine that the use of rate reduction bonds to finance or refinance utility projects provides substantial benefits to the publicly owned utility. These benefits may include, but are not limited to, lower interest rates on rate reduction bonds and more favorable capitalization and debt service coverage ratio treatment that results in gross or present value lifetime savings for the publicly owned utility.(d)(1)Subject to the requirements of Article XIII D of the California Constitution, to the extent applicable, an authority financing the costs of a utility project or projects for a local agency’s publicly owned utility with rate reduction bonds is authorized and directed to impose and collect a utility project charge with respect to the rate reduction bonds as provided in this section. The imposition of the utility project charge shall be made and evidenced by the adoption of a financing resolution by the governing body of the authority. Upon the issuance of rate reduction bonds, the financing resolution adopted in connection with the issuance of rate reduction bonds shall be irrevocable. The financing resolution with respect to financing or refinancing a utility project or projects with rate reduction bonds for a publicly owned utility shall include all of the following:(A)The addition of a separate charge to the bill of each customer of the publicly owned utility in the class or classes of customers specified in the financing resolution.(B)A description of the financial calculation, formula, or other method that the authority is to use to determine the utility project charge. The calculation, formula, or other method shall include a periodic adjustment method to the then current utility project charge, to be applied at least annually, that shall be used by the authority to correct for any overcollection or undercollection of financing costs from the utility project charge or any other adjustment necessary to ensure timely payment of the financing costs of the rate reduction bonds, including, but not limited to, the adjustment of the utility project charge to pay any debt service coverage requirement for the rate reduction bonds. The financial calculation, formula, or other method, including the periodic adjustment method, established in the financing resolution pursuant to this section, and the allocation of utility project charges to, and among, customers of the publicly owned utility shall be decided solely by the governing body of the authority and shall be final and conclusive. In no event shall the periodic adjustment method established in the financing resolution be applied less frequently than required by the financing resolution and the documents relating to the applicable rate reduction bonds. Once the financial calculation, formula, or other method for determining the utility project charge, and the periodic adjustment method, have been established in the financing resolution and have become final and conclusive as provided in this section, they shall not be changed.(C)Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the imposition of a utility project charge shall comply with the requirements of Article XIII D of the California Constitution, to the extent applicable, including, but not limited to, the provision of a notice containing the initial amount of the proposed utility project charge and the periodic adjustment method by which the utility project charge amount could subsequently change.(D)A requirement that the authority enter into a servicing agreement for the collection of the utility project charge with the local agency for which the financing is undertaken or its publicly owned utility and the local agency or its publicly owned utility shall act as a servicing agent for purposes of collecting the utility project charge as long as the servicing agreement remains in effect. Moneys collected by the local agency or its publicly owned utility, acting as a servicing agent on behalf of the authority, as a utility project charge shall be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the persons entitled to the financing costs to be paid, directly or indirectly, from the utility project charge and shall not lose their character as revenues of the authority by virtue of possession by the local agency or its publicly owned utility. The local agency or its publicly owned utility shall provide the authority with the information as to estimated sales of water, wastewater, or electrical services and any other information concerning the publicly owned utility required by the authority in connection with the initial establishment and the adjustment of the utility project charge.(2)The determination of the legislative body of the local agency that a project to be financed with rate reduction bonds is a utility project shall be final and conclusive and the rate reduction bonds issued to finance the utility project and the utility project charge imposed relating to the rate reduction bonds shall be valid and enforceable in accordance with the terms of the financing resolution and the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds. The authority shall require, in its financing resolution with respect to a utility project charge, that as long as a customer in the class or classes of customers specified in the financing resolution receive water or electricity or discharge wastewater through the facilities of the publicly owned utility, the customer shall pay the utility project charge regardless of whether or not the customer has an agreement to purchase water or electricity or discharge wastewater from a person or entity other than the publicly owned utility. The utility project charge shall be a nonbypassable charge to all customers of the publicly owned utility in the class or classes of customers specified in the financing resolution at the time of adoption of the financing resolution and all future customers in that class or classes. If a customer of the publicly owned utility that is subject to a utility project charge enters into an agreement to purchase water or electricity or discharge wastewater from a person or entity other than the publicly owned utility, the customer shall remain liable for the payment of its share of the utility project charge as if it had not entered into the agreement. The liability may be discharged by the continued payment of its share of the utility project charge as it accrues or by a one-time payment, as determined by the authority. All provisions of a financing resolution adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be binding on the authority.(3)The timely and complete payment of all utility project charges by a person liable for the charges shall be a condition of receiving water, wastewater, or electrical service, as applicable, from the publicly owned utility of the local agency and each of the local agencies and their publicly owned utilities is authorized to use its established collection policies and all rights and remedies provided by law to enforce payment and collection of the utility project charge. In no event shall a person liable for a utility project charge be entitled or authorized to withhold payment, in whole or in part, of the utility project charge for any reason.(4)The authority shall determine whether adjustments to the utility project charge relating to rate reduction bonds are required upon the issuance of the rate reduction bonds and at least annually, and at additional intervals as may be provided for in the financing resolution or the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds. Each adjustment shall be made and put into effect in accordance with the financial calculation, formula, or other method that the authority is to use to determine the utility project charge pursuant to the financing resolution expeditiously after the authority’s determination that the adjustment is required.(5)All revenues with respect to utility project property related to rate reduction bonds, including payments of the utility project charge, shall be applied first to the payment of the financing costs of the related rate reduction bonds then due, including the funding of reserves for the rate reduction bonds, with any excess being applied as determined by the authority for the benefit of the utility for which the rate reduction bonds were issued.(6)The authority shall be obligated to impose and collect the utility project charge relating to rate reduction bonds in amounts, based on estimates of water or electricity usage or wastewater discharge subject to the utility project charge, sufficient to pay on a timely basis the financing costs associated with the rate reduction bonds when due. The pledge of a utility project charge to secure the payment of rate reduction bonds shall be irrevocable, and the State of California, the authority, or any limited liability company acting pursuant to subdivision (j) shall not reduce, impair, or otherwise adjust the utility project charge, except that the authority shall implement the periodic adjustments to the utility project charge relating to rate reduction bonds as required by the applicable financing resolution and the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds. Revenue from a utility project charge shall be deemed special revenue of the authority and shall not constitute revenue of the local agency or its publicly owned utility for any purpose, including, without limitation, any dedication, commitment, or pledge of revenue, receipts, or other income that the local agency or its publicly owned utility has made or will make for the security of any of its obligations.(7)A utility project charge shall constitute utility project property when, and to the extent that, a financing resolution authorizing the utility project charge has become effective in accordance with its terms, and the utility project property shall thereafter continuously exist as property for all purposes with all of the rights and privileges of this section for the period, and to the extent, provided in the financing resolution, but in any event until all financing costs with respect to the related rate reduction bonds are paid in full, including all arrearages thereon.(8)Utility project property shall constitute a current property right notwithstanding that the value of the property right will depend on consumers using water, wastewater, or electrical services or, in those instances where consumers are customers of the publicly owned utility, the publicly owned utility performing certain services.(9)If a local agency for which rate reduction bonds have been issued and remain outstanding ceases to operate a water, wastewater, or electric utility, either directly or through its publicly owned utility, references in this section to the local agency or to its publicly owned utility shall be to the entity providing water, wastewater, or electrical services in lieu of the local agency and the entity shall assume and perform all obligations of the local agency and its publicly owned utility required by this section and the servicing agreement with the local agency while the rate reduction bonds remain outstanding.(e)(1)Rate reduction bonds shall be within the parameters of the financing or refinancing set forth by the local agency pursuant to subdivision (b) in connection with the rate reduction bonds and the proceeds of the rate reduction bonds made available to the local agency or its publicly owned utility shall be used for the utility project identified in the application for financing or refinancing of the utility project or projects pursuant to subdivision (b).(2)An authority shall authorize the issuance of rate reduction bonds by a resolution of its governing body. An authority issuing rate reduction bonds shall include in its preliminary notice and final report for the rate reduction bonds submitted to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission pursuant to Section 8855 a statement that the rate reduction bonds are being issued pursuant to this section. An authority issuing rate reduction bonds shall include in its final report for the rate reduction bonds submitted to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission pursuant to Section 8855 the estimated savings or local agency benefit, if applicable pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), realized by issuing the rate reduction bonds rather than bonds payable from the revenues of the publicly owned utility for whose benefit the rate reduction bonds were issued. Rate reduction bonds shall be nonrecourse to the credit or any assets of the local agency and the publicly owned utility for which the utility project is financed and shall be payable from, and secured by a pledge of, the utility project property relating to the rate reduction bonds and any additional security or credit enhancement specified in the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds.(3)An authority issuing rate reduction bonds shall pledge the utility project property relating to the rate reduction bonds as security for the payment of the rate reduction bonds, which pledge shall be made pursuant to, and with the effect set forth in Section 5451. All rights of an authority with respect to utility project property pledged as security for the payment of rate reduction bonds shall be for the benefit of, and enforceable by, the beneficiaries of the pledge to the extent provided in the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds.(4)To the extent that any interest in utility project property is pledged as security for the payment of rate reduction bonds, the applicable local agency or its publicly owned utility shall contract with the authority, which contract shall be part of the utility project property, that the local agency or its publicly owned utility will continue to operate its publicly owned utility system that includes the financed utility project to provide service to its customers, will, as servicer, collect amounts in respect of the utility project charge for the benefit and account of the authority and the beneficiaries of the pledge of the utility project charge and will account for and remit these amounts to, or for the account of, the authority.(5)Notwithstanding any other law, any requirement under this section, a financing resolution, any other resolution of the authority, or the provisions of the documents relating to rate reduction bonds to the effect that the authority shall take action with respect to the utility project property relating to the rate reduction bonds shall be binding upon the authority, as its governing body may be constituted from time to time, and the authority shall have no power or right to rescind, alter, or amend any resolution or document containing the requirement.(6)Notwithstanding any other law, except as otherwise provided in this section with respect to adjustments to a utility project charge, the recovery of the financing costs for the rate reduction bonds from the utility project charge shall be irrevocable and the authority shall not have the power either by rescinding, altering, or amending the applicable financing resolution or otherwise, to revalue or revise for ratemaking purposes the financing costs of rate reduction bonds, determine that the financing costs for the related rate reduction bonds or the utility project charge is unjust or unreasonable, or in any way reduce or impair the value of utility project property that includes the utility project charge, either directly or indirectly; nor shall the amount of revenues arising with respect to the financing costs for the related rate reduction bonds or the utility project charge be subject to reduction, impairment, postponement, or termination for any reason until all financing costs to be paid from the utility project charge are fully met and discharged. Except as otherwise provided in this section with respect to adjustments to a utility project charge, the State of California does hereby pledge and agree with the owners of rate reduction bonds that the State of California shall neither limit nor alter the financing costs or the utility project property, including the utility project charge, relating to the rate reduction bonds, or any rights in, to, or under, the utility project property until all financing costs with respect to the rate reduction bonds are fully met and discharged. This section does not preclude limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision shall be made by law for the protection of the owners. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and undertaking by the State of California in the governing documents for rate reduction bonds. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the authority shall make the adjustments to the utility project charge relating to rate reduction bonds provided by this section and the documents related to those rate reduction bonds as may be necessary to ensure timely payment of all financing costs with respect to the rate reduction bonds. The adjustments shall not impose the utility project charge upon classes of customers that were not subject to the utility project charge pursuant to the financing resolution imposing the utility project charge.(f)(1)Financing costs in connection with rate reduction bonds do not constitute a debt or liability of the State of California or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the special obligation of the authority, and do not constitute a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State of California or any of its political subdivisions, including the authority, but are payable solely from the funds provided therefor under this section and in the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds. This subdivision shall in no way preclude guarantees or credit enhancements in connection with rate reduction bonds. All the rate reduction bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect:Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California or any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on, this bond.(2)The issuance of rate reduction bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the State of California or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of taxation to pay the rate reduction bonds or to make any appropriation for their payment.(g)(1)Utility project property shall constitute property for all purposes, including for contracts securing rate reduction bonds, whether or not the revenues and proceeds arising with respect thereto have accrued.(2)Subject to the terms of the pledge document with respect to a pledge of utility project property, the validity and relative priority of a pledge created or authorized under this section is not defeated or adversely affected by the commingling of revenues arising with respect to the utility project property with other funds of the local agency or the publicly owned utility collecting a utility project charge on behalf of an authority.(h)(1)There shall exist a statutory lien on the utility project property relating to rate reduction bonds. Upon the effective date of the financing resolution relating to rate reduction bonds, there shall exist a first priority statutory lien on all utility project property, then existing or thereafter arising, to secure the payment of the rate reduction bonds. This lien shall arise pursuant to law by operation of this section automatically without any action on the part of the authority, the local agency or its publicly owned utility, or any other person. This lien shall secure the payment of all financing costs, then existing or subsequently arising, to the holders of the rate reduction bonds, the trustee or representative for the holders of the rate reduction bonds, and any other entity specified in the financing resolution or the documents relating to the rate reduction bonds. This lien shall attach to the utility project property regardless of who shall own, or shall subsequently be determined to own, the utility project property including any local agency or its publicly owned utility, the authority, or any other person. This lien shall be valid and enforceable against the owner of the utility project property and all third parties upon the effectiveness of the financing resolution without any further public notice.(2)The statutory lien on utility project property created by this section is a continuously perfected lien on all revenues and proceeds arising with respect thereto, whether or not the revenues or proceeds have accrued. Utility project property shall constitute property for all purposes, including for contracts securing rate reduction bonds, whether or not the revenues or proceeds arising with respect thereto have accrued.(3)In addition, the authority may require, in a financing resolution creating utility project property, that, in the event of default by the local agency or its publicly owned utility, in payment of revenues arising with respect to the utility project property, any court in the state, upon the application by the beneficiaries of the statutory lien, and without limiting any other remedies available to the beneficiaries by reason of the default, shall order the sequestration and payment to the beneficiaries of revenues arising with respect to the utility project property.(i)Notwithstanding any other law, an authority or a limited liability company acting pursuant to subdivision (j) that has financed a utility project through the issuance of rate reduction bonds is not authorized, and no governmental officer or organization shall be empowered to authorize the authority, to become a debtor in a case under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.) or to become the subject of any similar case or proceeding under any other law, whether federal or State of California, as long as any payment obligation from utility project property remains with respect to the rate reduction bonds.(j)An authority may elect to implement a financing of a utility project pursuant to this section by forming a single member limited liability company and by authorizing the company to adopt the financing resolution. The authority may issue rate reduction bonds payable from, and secured by a pledge of, amounts paid by the company to the authority from the applicable utility project property pursuant to an agreement. The provisions of subdivisions (g) and (h) shall apply to and be the exclusive method of perfecting a pledge of utility project property by the company securing the payment of financing costs under any agreement of the company in connection with the issuance of rate reduction bonds. Reference to the authority in this section and in all related defined terms shall mean or include the company as necessary to implement this subdivision.(k)After December 31, 2036, the authority to issue rate reduction bonds under this section terminates.SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 44559.1 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:44559.1. As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise, all of the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Authority” means the California Pollution Control Financing Authority.(b) “California Capital Access Fund” means a fund created within the authority to be used for purposes of the program.(c) “Executive director” means the Executive Director of the California Pollution Control Financing Authority.(d) (1) “Financial institution” means a federal- or state-chartered bank, savings association, credit union, not-for-profit community development financial institution certified under Part 1805 (commencing with Section 1805.100) of Chapter XVIII of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or a consortium of these entities. A consortium of those entities may include a nonfinancial corporation, if the percentage of capitalization by all nonfinancial corporations in the consortium does not exceed 49 percent.(2) (A) “Financial institution” also includes a lending institution that has executed a participation agreement with the Small Business Administration under the guaranteed loan program pursuant to Part 120 (commencing with Section 120.1) of Chapter I of Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations and meets the requirements of Section 120.410 of Chapter I of Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a small business investment company licensed pursuant to Part 107 (commencing with Section 107.20) of Chapter I of Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and a small business financial development corporation, as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or microbusiness lender, as defined in Section 12100 of the Government Code, that meets standards that shall be established by the authority. For loans where all or part of the fees and matching contributions are paid by an entity participating in the program pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 44559.2, “financial institution” also includes financial lenders, as defined in Section 22009 of the Financial Code, making commercial loans, as defined in Section 22502 of the Financial Code.(B) A financial institution described in this paragraph shall meet either of the following conditions:(i) It is domiciled in this state.(ii) It has its principal office in this state.(3) “Financial institution” also includes an insured depository institution, insured credit union, or community development financial institution, as these terms are defined in Section 4702 of Title 12 of the United States Code.(e) “Loss reserve account” means an account in the State Treasury or any financial institution that is established and maintained by the authority for the benefit of a financial institution participating in the Capital Access Loan Program established pursuant to this article for the purposes of the following:(1) Depositing all required fees paid by the participating financial institution and the qualified business.(2) Depositing contributions made by the state and, if applicable, the federal government or other sources.(3) Covering losses on enrolled qualified loans sustained by the participating financial institution by disbursing funds accumulated in the loss reserve account.(f) “Participating financial institution” means a financial institution that has been approved by the authority to enroll qualified loans in the program and has agreed to all terms and conditions set forth in this article and as may be required by any applicable federal law providing matching funding.(g) “Passive real estate ownership” means ownership of real estate for the purpose of deriving income from speculation, trade, or rental, but does not include any of the following:(1) The ownership of that portion of real estate being used or intended to be used for the operation of the business of the owner of the real estate.(2) The ownership of real estate for the purpose of construction or renovation, until the completion of the construction or renovation phase.(h) “Program” means the Capital Access Loan Program created pursuant to this article.(i) “Qualified business” means a small business concern that meets both of the following criteria, regardless of whether the small business concern has operations that affect the environment:(1) It is a corporation, partnership, cooperative, or other entity, whether that entity is a nonprofit entity or an entity established for profit, that is authorized to conduct business in the state.(2) It has its primary business location within the boundaries of the state.(j) (1) “Qualified loan” means a loan or a portion of a loan made by a participating financial institution to a qualified business for any business activity that has its primary economic effect in California. A qualified loan may be made in the form of a line of credit, in which case the participating financial institution shall specify the amount of the line of credit to be covered under the program, which may be equal to the maximum commitment under the line of credit or an amount that is less than that maximum commitment. A qualified loan made under the program may be made with the interest rates, fees, and other terms and conditions agreed upon by the participating financial institution and the borrower.(2) “Qualified loan” does not include any of the following:(A) A loan for the construction or purchase of residential housing.(B) A loan to finance passive real estate ownership.(C) A loan for the refinancing of an existing loan when and to the extent that the outstanding balance is not increased.(D) A loan, the proceeds of which will be used in any manner that could cause the interest on any bonds previously issued by the authority to become subject to federal income tax.(k) “Severely affected community” means any area classified as an enterprise zone pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act (Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), any area, as designated by the executive director, contiguous to the boundaries of a military base designated for closure pursuant to Section 2687 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended, and any other comparable economically distressed geographic area so designated by the executive director from time to time.(l)  “Small Business Assistance Fund” means a fund created within the authority pursuant to Section 44548.(m) “Small business concern” has the same meaning as in Section 632 of Title 15 of the United States Code, or as otherwise provided in regulations of the authority.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Section 44559.10 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:44559.10. (a) (1) The California Capital Access Fund may receive and accept any other private, state, or federal funding source not otherwise described in this article to provide financial assistance for the purposes of this article.(2) When the authority gains access to a funding source described in paragraph (1), the authority shall develop and adopt by resolution the terms and conditions describing the financial assistance to be provided with moneys from the funding source.(b) The authority may divide the fund into separate accounts.(c) All moneys accruing to the authority pursuant to this article from any source shall be deposited into the fund.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. Section 44559.13 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:44559.13. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in this act to create and fund the California Americans with Disabilities Act Small Business Capital Access Loan Program to assist small businesses in complying with the Americans with Disabilities Act. It is not the intent of the Legislature to assist the physical expansion of small businesses that includes modifications that comply with the Americans with Disabilities Act. The program shall be administered by the California Pollution Control Financing Authority and follow the terms and conditions for the Capital Access Loan Program for Small Businesses in this article with the additional program requirements specified under this section.(b) For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:(1) “Americans with Disabilities Act” means the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and amendments thereto.(2) “California Americans with Disabilities Act Small Business Capital Access Loan Program Fund” or “fund” means a fund established and administered by the authority pursuant to Sections 44548 and 44549 to be used for purposes of this program.(3) (A) “Eligible cost” means and includes all or any part of the price of construction, purchase price of real or personal property, the price of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures, the price of all machinery and equipment, the amount of financing charges and interest before, during, and for a period not to exceed the later of one year or one year following completion of construction, as determined by the authority, the price of insurance during construction, the amount of funding or financing noncapital expenses, the amount of reserves for principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements, the price of engineering, financial, and legal services and other service contracts, the price of plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates, administrative expenses, and any other expenses of funding or financing, that are necessary and allocable to the eligible project.(B) “Eligible cost” shall not include costs not directly related to physical alterations necessary for compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act.(4) “Eligible project” means the physical alterations or retrofits to an existing small business facility of less than 10,000 square feet necessary to ensure that facility is in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, and the financing necessary to pay eligible costs of the project.(5) “Financial assistance” means any of the following:(A) Loans.(B) Loan loss reserves.(C) Interest rate deductions.(D) Proceeds of bonds issued by the authority.(E) Bond insurance.(F) Loan participation payments.(G) Credit enhancements.(H) Liquidity facilities.(I) Contributions of money.(J) A combination of any of subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive.(6) “Qualified loan” means a loan or portion of a loan as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 44559.1, where the proceeds of the loan or portion of the loan are limited to the eligible costs for an eligible project under this program, and where the loan or portion of the loan does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(7) “Small business” or “qualified business” means a business that is independently owned and operated and not dominant in its field that meets both of the following additional criteria:(A) It has 30 or fewer full-time equivalent employees, or it has less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in total gross annual income from all sources.(B) It does not provide overnight accommodations.(c) (1) The California Americans with Disabilities Act Small Business Capital Access Loan Program Fund is established in the State Treasury for, and shall be administered by the authority pursuant to Sections 44548 and 44549 for, this program. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the authority for carrying out the purposes of this section. The authority may divide the fund into separate accounts. All moneys accruing to the authority pursuant to this section from any source shall be deposited into the fund.(2) All moneys in the fund derived from any source shall be held in trust for the life of this program, subject to the program expenditures and costs of administering this section, as follows:(A) Program expenditures shall include all of the following:(i) Contributions paid by the authority in support of qualified loans.(ii) Payments made to borrowers enrolling loans to participate in the program, to the extent that moneys other than the initial appropriation are deposited into the fund by the authority and are authorized for that use pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).(iii) Reasonable costs to educate the small business community and participating lenders about the program, including travel within the state.(iv) Financial assistance determined by, approved by resolution of, and provided by the authority, directly or indirectly, to a small business or qualified business under terms established by the authority.(B) Administrative expenditures shall be limited to 5 percent of the initial appropriation plus 5 percent of all moneys recaptured, and shall include all of the following:(i) Personnel costs.(ii) Service and vending contracts necessary to carry out the program.(iii) Other reasonable direct and indirect administrative costs.(3) The authority may direct the Treasurer to invest moneys in the fund that are not required for its current needs in the eligible securities specified in Section 16430 of the Government Code as the authority shall designate. The authority may direct the Treasurer to deposit moneys in interest-bearing accounts in state or national banks or other financial institutions having principal offices located in the state. The authority may alternatively require the transfer of moneys in the fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. All interest or other increment resulting from an investment or deposit shall be deposited into the fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code. Moneys in the fund shall not be subject to transfer to any other fund pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, excepting the Surplus Money Investment Fund.(d) The authority shall adopt regulations pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44520 to implement the program, including provisions specific to this program as described in this section and further including provisions to:(1) Establish a new loss reserve account for each participating lender enrolling loans in this program.(2) Obtain a certification from each participating lender and small business upon enrollment of a qualified loan that the proceeds of the loan will be used for the eligible costs of an eligible project.(3) Contribute an additional incentive from the fund for each loan enrolled for a qualified business located in a severely affected community, or make nonreimbursable payments from other moneys to participating borrowers to offset all or a portion of the reasonable costs of architectural inspections obtained from a person who is certified as an access specialist pursuant to the program described in Section 4459.5 of the Government Code.(4) Restrict the enrollment of a qualified loan in any other Capital Access Loan Program for small business offered by the authority as long as funds are available for this program.(5) Limit the term of loss coverage for each qualified loan to no more than five years.(6) Recapture from the loss reserve account the authority’s contribution for each enrolled loan upon the maturation of such loan or after five years from the date of enrollment, whichever happens first, to be deposited into the fund and applied to future program and administrative expenditures.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. Section 44559.14 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:44559.14. (a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the act adding this section to create and fund a program to assist residential property owners and small business owners in seismically retrofitting residences and small businesses with a priority on soft-story buildings and unreinforced brick and concrete buildings. It is not the intent of the Legislature to assist the physical expansion of small businesses and residences.(2) The Legislature hereby establishes the California Seismic Safety Capital Access Loan Program. The program shall cover losses on qualified loans by participating lenders to qualified residential property owners or qualified small businesses for eligible projects, as specified under this section. The program shall be administered by the California Pollution Control Financing Authority and follow the terms and conditions for the Capital Access Loan Program in this article with the additional program requirements specified under this section.(b) For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:(1) “Seismic retrofit construction” means alteration performed on or after January 1, 2017, of a qualified building or its components to substantially mitigate seismic damage. “Seismic retrofit construction” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Anchoring the structure to the foundation.(B) Bracing cripple walls.(C) Bracing hot water heaters.(D) Installing automatic gas shutoff valves.(E) Repairing or reinforcing the foundation to improve the integrity of the foundation against seismic damage.(F) Anchoring fuel storage.(G) Installing an earthquake-resistant bracing system for mobilehomes that are registered with the Department of Housing and Community Development.(H) Strengthening a building’s lateral load resisting system.(2) “Eligible costs” means the costs paid or incurred on or after January 1, 2017, for an eligible project, including any engineering or architectural design work necessary to permit or complete the eligible project less the amount of any grant provided by a public entity for the eligible project. “Eligible costs” do not include costs paid or incurred for any of the following:(A) Maintenance, including abatement of deferred or inadequate maintenance, and correction of violations unrelated to the seismic retrofit construction.(B) Repair, including repair of earthquake damage.(C) Seismic retrofit construction required by local building codes as a result of addition, repair, building relocation, or change of use or occupancy.(D) Other work or improvement required by local building or planning codes as a result of the intended seismic retrofit construction.(E) Rent reductions or other associated compensation, compliance actions, or other related coordination involving the qualified residential property owner or qualified small business and any other party, including a tenant, insurer, or lender.(F) Replacement of existing building components, including equipment, except as needed to complete the seismic retrofit construction.(G) Bracing or securing nonpermanent building contents.(H) The offset of costs, reimbursements, or other costs transferred from the qualified residential property owner or qualified small business to others.(3) “Eligible project” means seismic retrofit construction that is necessary to ensure that the qualified building is capable of substantially mitigating seismic damage, and the financing necessary to pay eligible costs of the project.(4) “Financial assistance” means any of the following:(A) Loans.(B) Loan loss reserves.(C) Interest rate deductions.(D) Proceeds of bonds issued by the authority.(E) Bond insurance.(F) Loan participation payments.(G) Credit enhancements.(H) Liquidity facilities.(I) Contributions of money.(J) A combination of any of subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive.(5) “Qualified building” means a residential or commercial building that is identified by the local building code official for the jurisdiction in which the building is located as a building in need of seismic retrofitting and is either a building of a type that is potentially vulnerable in the event of a catastrophic earthquake or a building constructed before 1981.(6) “Qualified loan” means a loan or portion of a loan as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 44559.1, where the proceeds of the loan or portion of the loan are limited to the eligible costs for an eligible project under this program, and where the loan or portion of the loan does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).(7) “Qualified small business” means a business referred to in subdivisions (i) and (m) of Section 44559.1 that owns a qualified building regardless of owner occupancy, notwithstanding the restriction on passive real estate ownership in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 44559.1.(8) “Qualified residential property owner” means either an owner of a residential building that is a qualified building or a qualified small business that owns one or more residential buildings, including a multiunit housing building, that is a qualified building, notwithstanding the restriction on passive real estate ownership in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 44559.1.(c) (1) The California Seismic Safety Capital Access Loan Program Fund is established in the State Treasury and shall be administered by the authority pursuant to Sections 44548 and 44549 for this program. For purposes of this section, the references in Sections 44548 and 44549 to “small business” shall include “qualified residential property owner,” as defined in this section. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the authority for carrying out this section. The authority may divide the fund into separate accounts. All moneys accruing to the authority pursuant to this section from any source shall be deposited into the fund.(2) All moneys in the fund derived from any source shall be held in trust for the life of this program, for program expenditures and costs of administering this section, as follows:(A) Program expenditures shall include both of the following:(i) Contributions paid by the authority in support of qualified loans.(ii) Costs for a qualified expert to validate that the proceeds of the loans are eligible costs, as defined under this section.(iii) Reasonable costs to educate the small business community, residential property owners, and participating lenders about the program, including travel within the state.(B) Administrative expenditures shall be limited to 5 percent of the initial appropriation plus 5 percent of all moneys recaptured, and shall include all of the following:(i) Personnel costs.(ii) Service and vending contracts, other than program expenditures described in subparagraph (A), that are necessary to carry out the program.(iii) Other reasonable direct and indirect administrative costs.(iv) Financial assistance determined by, approved by resolution of, and provided by the authority, directly or indirectly, to a qualified small business or qualified residential property owner under terms established by the authority.(3) The authority may direct the Treasurer to invest moneys in the fund that are not required for its current needs in the eligible securities specified in Section 16430 of the Government Code as the authority shall designate. The authority may direct the Treasurer to deposit moneys in interest-bearing accounts in state or national banks or other financial institutions having principal offices located in the state. The authority may alternatively require the transfer of moneys in the fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. All interest or other increment resulting from an investment or deposit shall be deposited into the fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code. Moneys in the fund shall not be subject to transfer to any other fund pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, excepting the Surplus Money Investment Fund.(d) The authority shall adopt regulations pursuant to Section 44520 to implement the program, including, but not limited to, provisions to:(1) Establish a new loss reserve account for each participating lender enrolling loans in this program.(2) Obtain a certification from each participating lender and qualified small business or qualified residential property owner upon enrollment of a qualified loan that the proceeds of the loan will be used for the eligible costs of an eligible project.(3) Contribute an additional incentive from the fund for each loan enrolled for a qualified small business or qualified residential property owner located in a severely affected community.(4) Restrict the enrollment of a qualified loan in any other Capital Access Loan Program for a qualified small business or qualified residential property owner offered by the authority as long as funds are available for this program.(5) Limit the term of loss coverage for each qualified loan to no more than 10 years.(6) Recapture from the loss reserve account the authority’s contribution for each enrolled loan upon the maturation of that loan or after 10 years from the date of enrollment, whichever happens first, to be deposited into the fund and applied to future program and administrative expenditures.(e) The authority may adopt regulations relating to residential property owner or small business financing as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of that Chapter 3.5, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. The regulations shall be repealed 180 days after their effective date, unless the adopting authority or agency complies with that Chapter 3.5.